Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1343.01
Unauthorized computer access; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of unauthorized computer access if the person intentionally and without authority penetrates a computer security system.

(2) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section in a manner that creates a grave risk of causing the death of a person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(3) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section in a manner that creates a risk to public health and safety shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(4) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section in a manner that compromises the security of data shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 5.